Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1096.
do enact as follows:AB1096,11Section 1. 234.40 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1096,3,42234.40 (4) The limitations established in ss. 234.18, 234.50, 234.60, 234.61, 1and 234.65, and 234.663 are not applicable to bonds issued under the authority of 2this section. The authority may not have outstanding at any one time bonds for 3veterans housing loans in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $61,945,000, 4excluding bonds being issued to refund outstanding bonds.AB1096,25Section 2. 234.50 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1096,3,126234.50 (4) The limitations established in ss. 234.18, 234.40, 234.60, 234.61, 7and 234.65, and 234.663 are not applicable to bonds issued under the authority of 8this section. The authority may not have outstanding at any one time bonds for 9housing rehabilitation loans in an aggregate principal amount exceeding 10$100,000,000, excluding bonds being issued to refund outstanding bonds. The 11authority shall consult with and coordinate the issuance of bonds with the building 12commission prior to the issuance of bonds.AB1096,313Section 3. 234.60 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1096,3,1514234.60 (2) The limitations in ss. 234.18, 234.40, 234.50, 234.61, and 234.65, 15and 234.663 do not apply to bonds or notes issued under this section.AB1096,416Section 4. 234.61 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1096,3,2417234.61 (1) Upon the authorization of the department of health services, the 18authority may issue bonds or notes and make loans for the financing of housing 19projects which are residential facilities as defined in s. 46.28 (1) (d) and the 20development costs of those housing projects, if the department of health services 21has approved the residential facilities for financing under s. 46.28 (2). The 22limitations in ss. 234.18, 234.40, 234.50, 234.60, and 234.65, and 234.663 do not 23apply to bonds or notes issued under this section. The definition of “nonprofit 24corporation” in s. 234.01 (9) does not apply to this section.AB1096,51Section 5. 234.65 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1096,4,32234.65 (1) (b) The limits in ss. 234.18, 234.40, 234.50, 234.60, and 234.61, and 3234.663 do not apply to bonds or notes issued under this section.AB1096,64Section 6. 234.663 of the statutes is created to read:AB1096,4,65234.663 Gap funding for workforce housing revolving loan fund and 6program. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1096,4,97(a) “Area median income” means the area median family income in the county 8in which the housing is located, adjusted for family size, as published annually by 9the federal department of housing and urban development.AB1096,4,1110(b) “Developer” means a person that constructs or creates residential housing 11and that is any of the following:AB1096,4,12121. A person other than a city, village, town, or county.AB1096,4,13132. A tribal housing or business entity created by a tribal council.AB1096,4,1514(c) “Eligible governmental unit” means the governmental unit in which an 15eligible project is located.AB1096,4,1816(d) “Eligible project” means a project related to the construction or creation of 17workforce housing in this state and for which the developer of the residential 18housing has already received financial assistance for a portion of the project’s costs.AB1096,4,2019(e) “Governmental unit” means a city, village, town, county, or federally 20recognized American Indian tribe or band in this state.AB1096,4,2221(f) “Residential housing” means new single-family or multifamily housing for 22rent or sale to which any of the following applies:AB1096,4,23231. The housing is subject to taxation under ch. 70.AB1096,5,2242. The housing is not subject to taxation under ch. 70 because it is designated 1as reservation lands, as defined in s. 165.92 (1) (a), or as trust lands, as defined in s. 2165.92 (1) (d).AB1096,5,43(g) “Workforce housing” means residential housing that satisfies all of the 4following, as determined by the authority:AB1096,5,851. The estimated annual housing costs, as defined under s. 16.301 (3), do not 6exceed, or are not expected to exceed, 30 percent of 120 percent of the area median 7income, with family size determined using the federal imputed income limitation, 8as defined in 26 USC 42 (g) (2) (C).AB1096,5,1092. The housing is for occupancy by individuals whose annual household 10income is not more than 120 percent of the area median income.AB1096,5,1611(2) Establishment of fund. (a) There is established under the jurisdiction 12and control of the authority a gap funding for workforce housing revolving loan 13fund, for the purpose of providing loans under sub. (3). The authority may use 14moneys in the fund to cover actual and necessary expenses incurred to accomplish 15the purposes of this section and administer the fund. The fund shall consist of all of 16the following:AB1096,5,17171. All moneys deposited into the fund under par. (b).AB1096,5,18182. All moneys received from the repayment of loans awarded under sub. (3).AB1096,5,2419(b) 1. The authority shall issue its negotiable bonds in such principal amount 20and of such length of maturity as is necessary, in the opinion of the authority, to 21provide sufficient funds for deposit into the gap funding for workforce housing 22revolving loan fund, not to exceed $50,000,000, for the establishment of reserves to 23secure such bonds, and for all other expenditures of the authority incident to or 24necessary and convenient in connection therewith.AB1096,6,212. The limitations in ss. 234.18, 234.40, 234.50, 234.60, 234.61, and 234.65 do 2not apply to bonds issued under this subsection.AB1096,6,53(c) In its discretion, the authority may invest fund moneys that are not 4required for immediate use or disbursement in all of the following to the extent 5lawful for fiduciaries in this state:AB1096,6,861. An obligation of the United States or one of its agencies or 7instrumentalities, or an obligation the principal and interest of which are 8guaranteed by the United States or one of its agencies or instrumentalities.AB1096,6,1092. An obligation of any state, or of any county, city, or other political 10subdivision of a state, having long-term ratings in the AA category or higher.AB1096,6,11113. A certificate of deposit. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1096 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1096 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1096 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1096 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1096: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting